South Dakota, session 2026, SB92.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-2-30 be AMENDED:
11-2-30. After the a hearing, the board shall by resolution or ordinance, as
appropriate, either adopt or reject the on an amendment, supplement, change,
modification, or repeal, with or without changes or supplement requested by the board
pursuant to § 11-2-28 or in a petition pursuant to § 11-2-28 or 11-2-28.1, the board shall,
by resolution or ordinance, as appropriate, either adopt or reject the requested action,
with or without changes.
Consideration of any changes to the proposed amendment, supplement, change,
modification, or repeal may only be done if the time and place of the hearing is published
at least ten days in advance in a legal newspaper of the county. If adopted, the board
shall
If the board adopts the requested action, the board must publish a notice of the
fact of adoption once in a legal newspaper of the county and take effect on the twentieth
day after publication. pursuant to § 11-2-21.
The provisions of § 11-2-22 are applicable to this section the decision.
If the board rejects the requested action, the provisions of §§ 7-8-27 to 7-8-32,
inclusive, are applicable.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.